Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-330
Commission; grant easements.

The commission may grant easements across real estate under its control for purposes that are in the public interest and do not negate the primary purpose for which the real estate is owned or controlled by the commission.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 88.